Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 6. Execution Against the Person; Attachment of Person

§§ 1-17-601 through 1-17-614.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 449, 451 through 457, 459 through 463 and 490, related to execution against, and attachment of, the person.